North Carolina, session 2025, HB586.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be provided in the form of a
grant to the Young Men's Christian Association of Southeastern North Carolina, Inc., for the
expansion of the Midtown YMCA in Wilmington.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H586-v-1*